Washington statutes.
RCW 15.24.900

Purpose of chapter—Regulation of apples and apple products—Existing comprehensive scheme—Applicable laws.

(1) This chapter is passed:

(a) In the exercise of the police power of the state to assure, through this chapter, and other chapters, that the apple industry is highly regulated to protect the public health, to prevent fraudulent practices, to promote the welfare of the state, and to stabilize and protect the apple industry of the state as a vital and integral part of its economy for the benefit of all its citizens;

(b) Because the apple crop grown in Washington comprises one of the major agricultural crops of Washington, and that therefore the business of selling and distributing such crop and the expanding and protection of its market is of public interest;

(c) Because it is necessary and expedient to enhance the reputation of Washington apples in domestic and foreign markets;

(d) Because it is necessary to discover the health giving qualities and food and dietetic value of Washington apples, and to spread that knowledge throughout the world in order to increase the consumption of Washington apples;

(e) Because Washington grown apples are handicapped by high freight rates in competition with eastern and foreign grown apples in the markets of the world, and this disadvantage can only be overcome by education and advertising;

(f) Because the stabilizing and promotion of the apple industry, the enlarging of its markets, and the increasing of the consumption of apples are necessary to assure and increase the payment of taxes to the state and its subdivisions, to alleviate unemployment within the state, and increase wages for agricultural labor;

(g) To disseminate information giving the public full knowledge of the manner of production, the cost and expense thereof, the care taken to produce and sell only apples of the finest quality, the methods and care used in preparing for market, and the methods of sale and distribution to increase the amount secured by the grower therefor, so that they can pay higher wages and pay their taxes, and by such information to reduce the cost of distribution so that the spread between the cost to the consumer and the amount received by the grower will be reduced to the minimum absolutely necessary; and

(h) To protect the general public by educating it in reference to the various varieties and grades of Washington apples, the time to use and consume each variety, and the uses to which each variety should be put.

(2) The history, economy, culture, and future of Washington state's agricultural industry involves the apple industry. In order to develop and promote apples and apple products as part of an existing comprehensive scheme to regulate those products, the legislature declares:

(a) That it is vital to the continued economic well-being of the citizens of this state and their general welfare that its apple and apple products be properly promoted by establishing orderly, fair, sound, efficient, and unhampered marketing, grading, and standards of and for apples and apple products; and by working to stabilize the apple industry and by increasing consumption of apples and apple products within the state, nation, and internationally;

(b) That apple growers operate within a regulatory environment that imposes burdens on them for the benefit of society and the citizens of the state and includes restrictions on marketing autonomy. Those restrictions may impair the agricultural grower's ability to compete in local, domestic, and foreign markets;

(c) That it is in the overriding public interest that support for the apple industry be clearly expressed, that adequate protection be given to agricultural commodities, uses, activities, and operations, and that apples and apple products be promoted individually, as well as part of a comprehensive promotion of the agricultural industry to:

(i) Enhance the reputation and image of Washington state's agricultural industry;

(ii) Increase the sale and use of apples and apple products in local, domestic, and foreign markets;

(iii) Protect the public and consumers by correcting any false or misleading information and by educating the public in reference to the quality, care, and methods used in the production of apples and apple products, and in reference to the various sizes, grades, and varieties of apples and the uses to which each should be put;

(iv) Increase the knowledge of the health-giving qualities and dietetic value of apple products; and

(v) Support and engage in programs or activities that benefit the production, handling, processing, marketing, and uses of apples and apple products;

(d) That the apple industry is a highly regulated industry and that this chapter and the rules adopted under it are only one aspect of the regulation of the industry. Other regulations and restraints applicable to the apple industry include:

(i) Washington agriculture general provisions, chapter 15.04 RCW;

(ii) Pests and diseases, chapter 15.08 RCW;

(iii) Standards of grades and packs, chapter 15.17 RCW;

(iv) Tree fruit research, chapter 15.26 RCW;

(v) Controlled atmosphere storage, chapter 15.30 RCW;

(vi) Higher education in agriculture, chapter 28B.30 RCW;

(vii) Department of agriculture, chapter 43.23 RCW;

(viii) Fertilizers, minerals, and limes under chapter 15.54 RCW;

(ix) Organic products act under chapter 15.86 RCW;

(x) *Intrastate commerce in food, drugs, and cosmetics under chapter 69.04 RCW and rules;

(xi) Horticultural plants, Christmas trees, and facilities—Inspection and licensing under chapter 15.13 RCW;

(xii) Planting stock under chapter 15.14 RCW;

(xiii) Washington pesticide control act under chapter 15.58 RCW;

(xiv) Farm marketing under chapter 15.64 RCW;

(xv) Insect pests and plant diseases under chapter 17.24 RCW;

(xvi) Weights and measures under chapter 19.94 RCW;

(xvii) Agricultural products—Commission merchants, dealers, brokers, buyers, and agents under chapter 20.01 RCW; and

(xviii) The federal insecticide, fungicide, and rodenticide act under 7 U.S.C. Sec. 136; and

(e) That this chapter is in the exercise of the police powers of this state for the purposes of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

[ 2016 sp.s. c 15 s 11; 2011 c 103 s 27; 2002 c 313 s 134; 1961 c 11 s 15.24.900. Prior: 1937 c 195 s 1; RRS s 2874-1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 69.04 RCW was renamed "Intrastate commerce in drugs and cosmetics."

Purpose—2011 c 103: See note following RCW 15.26.120.

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.